Hawaii statutes.
§578-6 Notice to nonresident or unlocated
nonconsenting legal parent whose rights have not been terminated. If a
legal parent to whom notice must be given as aforesaid was never an inhabitant
of the State, or has removed therefrom, or if, after due diligence, the parent
cannot be found within the State, and the fact appears by affidavit to the
satisfaction of the court, it may be ordered by the court that the service be
made under section 578-7. [L 1919, c 3, pt of §1; RL 1925, §3037; RL 1935,
§4523; RL 1945, §12274; am L 1953, c 115, pt of §1; RL 1955, §331-6; HRS
§578-6; am L 1973, c 211, §3(d)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next